Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1404
Health care entity; disclose allowed amount or charge; updated estimate; other cost estimate.

(1) Prior to a nonemergency admission, procedure, or service and upon request by a patient or prospective patient, a health care entity within the patient’s or prospective patient’s insurer network shall, within three working days, disclose the allowed amount of the nonemergency admission, procedure, or service, including the amount for any facility fees required, to the patient or prospective patient.

(2) Prior to a nonemergency admission, procedure, or service and upon request by a patient or prospective patient, a health care entity outside the patient’s or prospective patient’s insurer network shall, within three working days, disclose the amount that will be charged for the nonemergency admission, procedure, or service, including the amount for any facility fees required, to the patient or prospective patient.

(3) If a health care entity is unable to quote a specific amount under subsection (1) or (2) of this section in advance due to the health care entity’s inability to predict the specific treatment or diagnostic code, the health care entity shall disclose what is known for the estimated amount for a proposed nonemergency admission, procedure, or service, including the amount for any facility fees required. A health care entity shall disclose the incomplete nature of the estimate and shall inform the patient or prospective patient of his or her ability to obtain an updated estimate once additional information is determined.

(4) If a patient or prospective patient is covered by insurance, a health care entity that participates in an insurance carrier’s network shall, upon request of a patient or prospective patient, provide, based on the information available to the health care entity at the time of the request, sufficient information regarding the proposed nonemergency admission, procedure, or service for the patient or prospective patient to receive a cost estimate from his or her insurance carrier to identify out-of-pocket costs, which could be through an insurance carrier's toll-free telephone number or website. A health care entity may assist a patient or prospective patient in using an insurance carrier’s toll-free telephone number or website.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 14.